Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.5. Housing Rehabilitation Zones.

§ 36-55.64.
Creation of local housing rehabilitation zones.

Any city, county, or town may establish, by ordinance, one or more housing rehabilitation zones for the purpose of providing incentives and regulatory flexibility in such zone.

The incentives provided in a housing rehabilitation zone may include, but not be limited to (i) reduction of permit fees, (ii) reduction of user fees, and (iii) waiver of tax liens to facilitate the sale of property that will be substantially renovated, rehabilitated or replaced.

Incentives established pursuant to this section may extend for a period of up to 10 years from the date of initial establishment of the housing rehabilitation zone; however, the extent and duration of any incentive shall conform to the requirements of applicable federal and state law.

The regulatory flexibility provided in a housing rehabilitation zone may include, but not be limited to (i) special zoning for the district, (ii) the use of a special permit process, (iii) exemption from certain specified ordinances, excluding ordinances or provisions of ordinances adopted pursuant to the requirements of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.), and the Virginia Stormwater Management Act (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.), and (iv) any other incentives adopted by ordinance, which shall be binding upon the locality for a period of up to 10 years.

The governing body may establish a service district for the provision of additional public services pursuant to Chapter 24 (§

15.2-2400

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

Each locality establishing a housing rehabilitation zone pursuant to this section may also apply for the designation of a housing revitalization zone pursuant to Chapter 11 (§

36-157

et seq.). Nothing in this chapter shall preclude such dual designation.

Any housing rehabilitation zone established pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to meet the requirements for designation of housing revitalization eligible to be financed as an economically mixed project pursuant to §

36-55.30:2

.

This section shall not authorize any local government powers that are not expressly granted herein.

History.

2006, c. 711; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, c. 331.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and substituted “Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.), and the Virginia Stormwater Management Act (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.)” for “Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 10.1-2100 et seq.), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§ 10.1-560 et seq.), and the Virginia Stormwater Management Act (§ 10.1-603.1 et seq.)” in subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 331 substituted “(§

36-157

et seq.)” for “§

36-159

et seq.) of Title 36” in subsection F.